Utah statutes.
52-8-201.   Prohibition.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a government entity may not include, as part of any report, the photograph or likeness of any elected official.

(2)  A report may contain the photograph or likeness of the chief executive officer of a government entity if the report is promotional literature.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

